Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 16 Canvass and Recount

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 370 to 404.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 119, 228, 235 to 239.

§ 22-16-101.
County canvassing board; compensation.

The county canvassing board is the county clerk and two (2) electors of different political parties resident in the county appointed by the county clerk. The two (2) electors shall receive the same compensation as election judges. All canvassing board members shall take an oath of office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-223; 2011, ch. 38, § 1; 2013 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to compensation of election judges, see §

22-8-116

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “county clerk” for “board of county commissioners” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Injunction against canvassing of votes and declaring result of election, 1 ALR2d 588.

§ 22-16-102.
Abstract of vote; returns not filed.

The county clerk shall prepare an abstract of the vote of all precincts in the county following a county primary, special or general election. The abstract shall contain all items required in W.S. 22-16-103(c)(viii).

The county clerk shall send a messenger to obtain returns not filed in his office within a reasonable length of time.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-224; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

added the second sentence in (a).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Authority in making abstracts of votes. —

In making abstracts of votes shown by precinct returns, canvassing board held not authorized to examine and recount the ballots or to go behind the entry made in the pollbooks showing the result of the count by the judges and clerks, or to examine and pass on the sufficiency of the affidavits of challenged or unregistered voters or those of voters in precincts where prior registration is not required or to do more than determine the genuineness of the returns. Pratley v. State, 17 Wyo. 371, 99 P. 1116,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1909).

No control by mandamus. —

Where return of vote of certain county, sent by the clerk thereof to state canvassing board, contained two abstracts of votes cast in such counties for members of the house of representatives, one made by the clerk, and the other by two justices of the peace whom he called to his assistance in canvassing the vote, the clerk's certificate to the return stating “that the foregoing is a full, true and correct copy of the abstract of the returns of all votes cast in said county for members of the state legislature,” the decision by such board as to which abstract was the official and legal return was not exercise of a judicial discretion, which the supreme court cannot control by mandamus. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

§ 22-16-103.
County canvass procedures.

Prior to the county canvass, the county clerk shall:

Examine the poll books, tally sheets, precinct certifications and oaths of election officials;

Summarize the number of votes cast in each precinct for every candidate appearing on the ballot and the total votes cast for write-in candidates, and upon each ballot proposition;

Count write-in votes by candidate if the total vote for write-in candidates may affect the result of an election. For offices elected from districts involving more than one (1) county, the secretary of state shall direct the county clerks to count write-in votes by candidate if on the basis of unofficial returns it appears the total write-in votes may affect the result of an election.

Repealed by Laws 2002, ch. 18, § 3.

The county canvassing board shall:

Meet as soon as all returns have been received and abstracted, but if any provisional ballots have been cast in the county, not before the time has passed for provisional voters to document their eligibility to register or to vote. The board shall meet at a time and place designated by the county clerk, but no later than the first Friday following the election;

Perform or review a reconciliation of the ballots by precinct;

Review and determine the eligibility of provisional voters to register at the election if not previously registered and to vote and determine whether their provisional ballots may be opened and counted. The canvassing board shall meet in executive session when necessary to protect the confidentiality of ballots and of a voter’s confidential personally identifiable information;

Count and tabulate the votes on the provisional ballots which were determined to have been cast by qualified electors;

Review and certify the abstracts after the validity of provisional ballots have been determined and discrepancies and ties have been resolved;

Review and certify successful write-in candidates after determination of the number of votes for candidates and verification of candidate qualification;

Cause minutes of the meeting to be taken, signed by the canvassing board and filed with the county clerk;

Ensure abstracts contain the following information:

For primary elections, the total ballots cast by party, including unaffiliated votes;

The number of electors voting in person and by absentee ballot by precinct at the election;

The full name of each of the following receiving votes:

Candidates printed on the ballot;

Write-in candidates, if the candidate received a sufficient number of votes; and

Nominated or elected write-in candidates.

The offices receiving votes;

The number of votes cast for each of the following receiving votes:

Candidates printed on the ballot;

Write-in candidates, if the candidate received a sufficient number of votes;

Nominated or elected write-in candidates;

The number of overvotes; and

The number of undervotes.

The official designation or number of each ballot proposition and the number of votes for and against it stated in figures; and

The number of provisional ballots cast.

The precinct returns of the municipal primary election shall be canvassed by the county canvassing board, which shall certify the results of such in writing to the county clerk and municipal clerk.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-225; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2001, ch. 116, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 94, § 2; 2008, ch. 115, § 1; 2010, ch. 3, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2018 ch. 118, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2004 amendment,

rewrote (c)(i), (iii), and (iv), pertaining to the procedure for determining the elgibility and validity of provisional ballots.

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “taken” for “recorded” in (c)(vi).

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (c)(vi) and redesignated former (c)(vi) as (c)(vii).

The 2015 amendment,

added
(c)(viii).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2018 amendment,

in (c)(viii)(C)(II) and (c)(viii)(E)(II), substituted “Write-in candidates, if the candidate received a sufficient number of votes” for “Valid write-in candidates.”

Laws 2018, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

§ 22-16-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to a meeting of the county canvassing board.

§ 22-16-105.
Tie votes.

A tie vote shall be decided at an open meeting by lots cast by the county canvassing board or other authority holding the election, except in elections for members of the state legislature, which shall be determined as provided in W.S.

22-16-119

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-227; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-16-106.
Write-in candidates.

Each write-in candidate nominated at a primary election, who has not previously filed an application for nomination shall accept nomination by filing an application for nomination and paying the filing fee in the office in which he would have been required to file an application for nomination to that office.

The chief election officer shall notify a write-in candidate who has been nominated at a primary election within forty-eight (48) hours after the canvassing board meets. Notification may be delivered by United States postal service or other generally accepted mail delivery method to the last known address of the write-in candidate, email or other electronic means that provide actual notice to the write-in candidate, or service as provided under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. Each notification provided under this section shall inform the write-in candidate that failure to timely respond will result in forfeiture of nomination. Failure of the successful write-in candidate to accept the nomination in the manner prescribed in subsection (a) of this section within five (5) days after delivery, attempted delivery or service under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, as computed pursuant to W.S.

22-2-110

, results in the successful write-in candidate not appearing on the general election ballot, but does not result in a vacancy which can be filled.

Any person may request to have the votes cast for any write-in candidate, whose votes did not affect the election, counted by filing a request together with an administrative fee, set by rule and regulation, with the appropriate election officers not later than two (2) days after the election in which the write-in votes occurred.

A write-in candidate elected to public office at a general or special election may decline election before taking the oath of office by filing written notice with the county clerk where the candidate resides and the secretary of state. Notice provided under this subsection shall immediately create a vacancy in the office which shall be filled in the manner prescribed in W.S.

22-18-101

through

22-18-112

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 1; 2001, ch. 116, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2008, ch. 115, § 1; 2011, ch. 38, § 1; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 118, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2008 amendment,

in (b), substituted “provided” for “accepted” in the first sentence, added “as computed pursuant to W.S.

22-2-110

” in the last sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), deleted “or elected” following “nominated”; in (b), substituted “a write-in candidate who has” for “write-in candidates who have” in the first sentence, and inserted the present third sentence; and in (c), inserted “together with an administrative fee, set by rule and regulation.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the last sentence, inserted “after delivery, attempted delivery or service under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” and deleted “of proof of service or attempted delivery” preceding “results in.”

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), substituted “for nomination shall accept nomination” for “accepts” following “filed an application” and inserted “nomination to” preceding “that office”; in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “nominated at a primary election” for “for election,” and in the third sentence inserted “in the manner prescribed in subsection (a) of this section”; and added (d).

Laws 2018, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “may be delivered” for “may be made,” “or other generally accepted mail delivery method to” for “any generally accepted business document delivery method evidenced by receipt of delivery or attempted delivery at,” and “write-in candidate, email or other electronic means that provide actual notice to the write-in candidate, or service” for “write-in candidate or service.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 1, effective January 1, 1999, enacted a new §

22-16-106

, and § 3 renumbered former §

22-16-106

as §

22-16-107

.

§ 22-16-107.
Certified results.

The certified results of the county canvass shall be posted in the office of the county clerk and copies made available to interested persons.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-228; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-106

; 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

§ 22-16-108.
Results furnished secretary of state.

Immediately upon completion of the county canvass, the county clerk shall notify the secretary of state of the election results. A copy of the county abstract, after being certified by the county canvassing boards, shall immediately be delivered by the county clerk to the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall provide procedures for such transmittal and notification through rule and regulation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-229; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-107

; 1998, ch. 100, § 3; 2007, ch. 39, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added the third sentence.

§ 22-16-109.
Recounts.

The county canvassing board shall make a recount of precinct votes if it appears to the board that a recount is required due to irregularities in that precinct.

There shall be a recount made of all the votes cast for any office in which the difference in number of votes cast for the winning candidate receiving the least number of votes and the number of votes cast for the losing candidate receiving the greatest number of votes is less than one percent (1%) of the number of votes cast for the winning candidate receiving the least number of votes cast for that office. This recount shall be made in the entire district in which the candidates are standing for election.

There shall be a recount made of all the votes cast for any office if a losing candidate requests one under provision of W.S.

22-16-110

. This recount shall be made in the entire district in which the candidate is standing for election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-230; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-108

; 1998, ch. 100, § 3.

Integrity of ballots must be securely protected and proved.—

In order for the recount of the ballots to overcome the returns of the election officials the contestant must prove that the ballots are those voted at the election and that they are in the same condition as they were when cast. The integrity of the ballots must be securely protected. In an election contest, it must be proved that they were so preserved that there was no reasonable opportunity for tampering with them. Wilson v. Burridge, 346 P.2d 282,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1959).

Same ballots and same number must be recounted. —

In order that a recount of votes may prevail over the count by the clerks and judges of the election, it must appear that the same ballots and the same number of ballots were counted in the recount as were cast in the election. Wilson v. Burridge, 346 P.2d 282,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1959).

§ 22-16-110.
How candidate may obtain recount; where affidavit filed.

A candidate may obtain a recount of votes for the office he is seeking by making and filing an affidavit alleging that fraud or error occurred in counting, returning or canvassing the votes cast in any part of the district in which he is standing for election. The affidavit shall be filed in the same office the candidate filed his application for nomination:

Not later than two (2) days after the county canvass has been completed if the office is certified by the county canvassing board;

Not later than two (2) days after the state canvass has been completed if the office is certified by the state canvassing board.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-231; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1992, ch. 1, § 5; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-109

; 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-16-111.
Recount of ballot proposition.

A recount of votes of a ballot proposition may be obtained in one (1) of the following manners:

A recount will be made if the proposition receives a number of votes, greater or lesser, within one percent (1%) of the number of votes required for passage. The one percent (1%) variance shall be calculated based upon the total number of votes cast on the proposition, except for constitutional amendments in which case the variance shall be calculated based upon the total number of votes cast in the election;

A recount will be made if requested in an affidavit signed by twenty-five (25) electors registered in a district voting on the question. The affidavit shall be filed with the county clerk not later than two (2) days after the county canvass has been completed for propositions voted on in one (1) county, and with the secretary of state not later than two (2) days after the state canvass has been completed for propositions voted on in more than one (1) county. The affidavit shall be accompanied by a deposit of one hundred dollars ($100.00).

The county in which the recount is taken shall pay the costs of the recount if the recount is required by subsection (a)(i) of this section; and the signers of the affidavit referred to in subsection (a)(ii) of this section shall be jointly and severally liable for the costs of the recount requested by them up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) per county recounted if the results of the election are not changed by the recount.

The result of the recount shall be the official result of the election.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-231.1; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-110

; 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-16-112.
Precincts to be recounted; recount official result.

The number of precincts to be recounted shall be as follows:

If the recount is requested by a candidate, all precincts in which that candidate was voted upon for that office shall be recounted;

If the recount is required by W.S. 22-16-109(b), all precincts in which that candidate was voted upon for that office shall be recounted;

If the recount is initiated by the state or county canvassing board because of possible irregularities in the counting of votes in a precinct, the recount shall be made in the precincts designated by the canvassing board initiating the recount.

If the recount indicates a different vote, the result of the recount shall be the official result.

In no event shall a county clerk certify the recount results later than seventy-two (72) hours after the recount is requested.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-232; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1992, ch. 1, § 5; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-111

; 1998, ch. 100, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2.

§ 22-16-113.
Recount deposit; expense of recount.

An affidavit requesting a recount must be accompanied by the following deposit:

If the difference in number of votes cast as calculated pursuant to W.S. 22-16-109(b) is one percent (1%) or greater but less than five percent (5%), five hundred dollars ($500.00);

If the difference in number of votes cast as calculated pursuant to W.S. 22-16-109(b) is five percent (5%) or greater, three thousand dollars ($3,000.00).

If the recount shows sufficient error to change the result of the election, the county in which the recount is taken shall pay expenses of the recount and the deposit shall be returned. Otherwise the applicant or applicants seeking the recount shall be liable for the actual cost of conducting the recount up to a maximum of the amount deposited under subsection (a) of this section, per county recounted. Every county clerk shall issue a complete accounting of all costs of the recount to the candidate requesting the recount, and shall refund any surplus to the candidate.

If the recount is initiated by the county canvassing board or required by W.S. 22-16-109(b), the cost of the recount shall be paid by the county in which the recount is taken regardless of the result of the recount.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-233; Laws 1975, ch. 185,§ 2; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-112

; 1998, ch. 100, § 3; 2017 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, redesignated the former paragraph as (a), (b), and (c); in (a), substituted “the following deposit” for “a deposit of one hundred dollars ($100.00)” and added (a)(i) and (a)(ii); and in (b), substituted “the amount deposited under subsection (a) of this section” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00)” in the second sentence.

§ 22-16-114.
Certificates of election or nomination after recount.

When the time within which to request a recount has expired without one being requested, or when a recount has been completed, the county clerk shall immediately prepare and mail certificates of election or nomination to each candidate nominated or elected to a county or precinct office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-234; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-113

; 1998, ch. 100, § 4; 2005, ch. 100, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted the last sentence which read, “A candidate shall file his statement of campaign receipts and expenditures when required before receiving a certificate of election or nomination or a vacancy will be declared to exist.”

§ 22-16-115.
State canvassing board.

The state canvassing board is the governor, secretary of state, state auditor and state treasurer.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-235; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-114

; 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

Purpose. —

The object and legislative intent in establishing a state canvassing board is to have such board canvass the vote cast for state officers generally, whether specified in the act or not. In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1893).

Canvass of state board

is based on the abstracts of returns. State ex rel. Sammon v. Chatterton, 12 Wyo. 168, 73 P. 961,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1903).

Certificate of election. —

The fact that certificate of election issued to a district judge on his election at a general election recited that he was elected for unexpired term of judge who had resigned cannot operate to shorten the term fixed by the constitution and laws of the state. State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1908).

Conflicting abstracts of vote. —

Where the canvassing board transmitted to the state canvassing board two abstracts of the votes of the county, one made by the clerk and one made by two justices of the peace against the clerk's protests, both duly certified, the abstract of the two justices constituted the official and legal returns of such county, which had to be canvassed by the state board. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

Cited

in

Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991).

§ 22-16-116.
Statewide abstract; discrepancies with county abstracts.

From the unofficial tabulations delivered directly to his office, the secretary of state shall tabulate a statewide abstract by counties of votes for president and vice-president, state officers, justice of the supreme court, United States senator, representative in congress, district court judges, circuit court judges, members of the state legislature and the votes for and against ballot propositions voted on by electors of a district larger than a county. The unofficial tabulation shall then be reconciled to the official abstracts of the county canvassing boards and the secretary of state shall prepare the state abstract from the official county abstracts.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-236; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-115

; 1998, ch. 100, § 3; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment

, inserted “circuit court judges” in the first sentence.

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-16-117.
Content of state abstract.

The state abstract of an election shall indicate by county the number of ballots cast by each political party, if known, the total votes cast for each candidate, the names of all write-in candidates receiving a sufficient number of votes to affect the result of the election and the number of votes for each, and the number of votes received for and against each ballot proposition.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-237; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-116

; 1998, ch. 100, § 3.

§ 22-16-118.
Meeting of state canvassing board.

The state canvassing board shall meet no later than the second Wednesday following the election. The secretary of state shall send a messenger to obtain official county abstracts not filed in a reasonable length of time. The canvassing board shall meet at the time and place set by the secretary of state. The board shall review the state abstracts prepared by the secretary of state, compare them with the tabulation and materials prepared by the secretary of state, resolve any tie votes, and certify the abstract as the official state canvass.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-238; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1977, ch. 186, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-117

; 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

Cited

in

Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991).

§ 22-16-119.
Tie vote in state abstract.

A tie vote for an office contained in the state abstract shall be resolved at an open meeting by lots cast by the state canvassing board.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-239; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-118

; 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

§ 22-16-120.
Filing of state abstract.

When the canvass by the state canvassing board is completed and certified, the secretary of state shall file the official state abstract in his office with the minutes of the state canvassing board meeting signed by the members of the state canvassing board. The secretary of state shall cause a copy of the official state canvass to be posted in the office of the secretary of state and shall make additional copies available to the public.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-240; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-119

; 1998, ch. 100, § 3.

§ 22-16-121.
Certificates of nomination and election following state or county canvass.

When the state canvass is concluded, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of nomination to each candidate nominated at a primary election and certify the names of nominees as provided in W.S.

22-6-101

. When the county canvass is concluded, the county clerk shall issue a certificate of nomination to each candidate nominated at a primary election or by petition.

The governor shall issue a certificate of election to a candidate duly elected to an office to be filled by electors of the state, district court judges, circuit court judges and members of the state legislature. The county clerk shall issue a certificate of election to each candidate duly elected to a county or precinct office in the county and to members elected to boards of trustees of special districts, school or community college districts and city or town councils.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-241; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1981, ch. 159, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-120

; 1998, ch. 100, § 3; 2005, ch. 100, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, at the end of all sentences in (a) and (b), deleted “provided the candidate has complied with W.S.

22-25-106

.”

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence of (b), inserted “circuit court judges”; in the last sentence of (b), substituted “special districts” for “hospital.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-16-122.
Election declared null and void; special election.

If a canvassing board is unable to determine which candidate has been elected or nominated, the canvassing board shall declare any part of the election results to be null and void as to that office and the county clerk shall call a special election to make a decision. For purposes of this section, a canvassing board shall be unable to determine which candidate is nominated or elected if:

A material error in the conduct of the election has occurred; and

The error involves a number of votes that is equal to or greater than the number of votes separating the winning and losing candidates.

The canvassing board shall determine which precincts will be involved in the special election. If the candidates’ office is voted on across county lines, the canvassing board of all counties involved shall meet to determine the criteria for the special election.

If only certain precincts are allowed to vote in the special election, the votes received in the special election shall be added to the unofficial results not declared null and void for that office from the initial primary, general election or other special election.

In a contest involving multiple candidates, all of the candidates’ names shall be placed on the ballot in the special election.

Any candidate may appeal the decision of the canvassing board to call or not to call a special election in the same manner as he would contest an election under this act. However, the appeal shall be filed in the district court no later than the first Monday following the meeting of the canvassing board where the decision being appealed was made.

The special election shall be held if necessary no later than the third Tuesday after the primary, general or other special election and may be held by a special mail ballot election as provided in W.S.

22-16-123

. The special election shall be conducted by the county clerk as nearly as possible in the manner of a primary or general election, except only those registered in the precinct at the close of polls on the election day of the primary, general or other special election in question shall be permitted to vote in the special election. If the election is held as a special mail ballot election, the election shall be held as provided in W.S.

22-16-123

.

Not more than fourteen (14) nor less than five (5) days before the special election the county clerk shall publish at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a proclamation setting forth the date of the election, the offices to be filled at the election including the terms of the offices, the number of persons required by law to fill the offices, the requirements for filing statements of campaign contributions and expenditures, and any other pertinent information.

A court ordered election may be held by special mail ballot election as determined by the county clerk or by the secretary of state if the election involves more than one (1) county.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-241.1; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

22-16-121

; 1998, ch. 100, § 3; 2011, ch. 76, § 2; 2014 ch. 105, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

As to contesting elections generally, see §§

22-17-101

to

22-17-114

.

The 2011 amendment,

inserted “and may be held by a special mail ballot election as provided in W.S.

22-16-123

” in (d) and (e); added the last sentence in (d) and (e); and added (f).

Laws 2011, ch. 76 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2011.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), inserted “any part of” and “results”; added present (b) and (c); redesignated former (b) through (f) as present (d) through (h); in present (d), substituted “all of the candidates' names shall be” for “no candidate who has clearly won or lost the contest shall be”; in present (e), added the last sentence; in present (f), inserted “general or other special” in the first sentence, deleted the second and third sentences which read: “ Any candidate may appeal the decision of the canvassing board in the same manner as he would contest an election under this act.
However, this appeal shall be filed in the district court no later than the first Monday following the meeting of the canvassing board whose decision is being appealed,” in the fourth sentence, substituted “or general election, except only those registered in the precinct at the close of polls on the election day of the primary, general or other special election in question shall be permitted to vote in the special election” for “election, except that registration at the polls shall not be permitted”; in (f), deleted the first which read: “The special election shall be held if necessary on the third Tuesday after the general election and may be held by a special mail ballot election as provided in W.S. 22 16 123,” deleted the next-to-last and last sentences which read: “The special election shall be conducted by the county clerk as nearly as possible in the manner of a general election.
If the election is held as a special mail ballot election, the election shall be held as provided in W.S. 22 16 123.”

Laws 2014, ch. 105, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (g), substituted “campaign contributions” for “campaign receipts.”